Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 3

Commercial Fishing

70-2-301. Promotion of commercial fishing.

The fish and wildlife commission is directed to promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to promote commercial fishing activity as an economically viable commercial enterprise in this state.

Acts 2011, ch. 338, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

70-2-302. Approval from the Convention for the International Trade of Endangered Species (CITES).

The agency shall request approval from the Convention for the International Trade of Endangered Species (CITES) to establish a length limit of no less than thirty-six inches (36") and an annual season length no shorter than November 15 to April 15. Should the approval not be granted, the agency is authorized to negotiate conditions under which the approval would be granted.

Acts 2011, ch. 338, § 1.

70-2-303. Resident preference in licensing — Nets — Study plan.

Tennessee residents shall be given preference in licensing with a limit on the number of nonresident permits.

All nets shall be properly buoyed to promote safety on the waters of the state.

The agency shall develop a plan to study sustainability, population conditions, and juvenile survival rates on waters not currently open to commercial roe fishing. With the assistance of the commercial fishing community in harvest surveys, such study shall include at least the following objectives:

Description of the size structure and age structure of the existing paddlefish population;

Determination of paddlefish population parameters including growth, recruitment, and natural mortality; and

Assessment of the likelihood that the paddlefish population can provide a sustainable commercial fishery.

Acts 2011, ch. 338, § 1.

70-2-304. Commercial fishing advisory committee.

To insure that the views of the commercial fishing community are appropriately communicated as well as to assist the wildlife resources agency in developing rules and regulations on commercial fishing, there is created a commercial fishing advisory committee. The committee members shall be named by the wildlife resources executive director and shall include, but not be limited to, licensed commercial fishers and roe fishers, dealers, and buyers. The members of the committee shall serve as volunteers and shall not be paid or reimbursed for time served as committee members.

Acts 2011, ch. 338, § 1.

70-2-208. Fur dealers — License requirements — Regulation of pelts — Penalties. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

70-2-212. Stocking of wildlife — Inspections — Charges.

70-2-219. Permits for hunting or fishing in designated areas — Trout fishing in premiere tourist resort cities — Disposition of funds from Reelfoot preservation permits — Privileges of senior citizen permit holders — Special elk-take permit. [See the Compiler's Notes.]